apertium-oc-es/apertium-oc-es.oc.metadix
    <pardef n="rec/ebre__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebriam</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebriái</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebriatz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebriás</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebràn</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebriá</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebrem</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebrai</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebretz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebràs</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebrián</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebrà</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebent</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>epiam</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>epiam</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebètz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebètz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ep</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ep</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__sigues"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebre</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebre</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__sigues"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebiam</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebiái</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebiatz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebiás</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebián</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebiá</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèrem</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèri</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèretz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebères</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèron</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèt</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèrem</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèri</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèretz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupères</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèron</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèt</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèssem</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèsse</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ebèssi</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèssetz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèsses</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèsson</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebèsse</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèssem</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèsse</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèssi</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèssetz</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèsses</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèsson</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupèsse</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebudas</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebuda</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebuts</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ebut</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupudas</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eupuda</l> 
        <r>ebre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>euputs</l> 

    <e lm="concebre" a="carmentano">
        <i>conc</i> 
        <par n="rec/ebre__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="decebre" a="carmentano">
        <i>dec</i> 
        <par n="rec/ebre__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="percebre">
        <i>perc</i> 
        <par n="rec/ebre__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="recebre">
        <i>rec</i> 
        <par n="rec/ebre__vblex"/> 
    </e>
